Maine, session 132, LD1712.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §850-B, sub-§7, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §7, is
amended to read:
7. Notice to employer. Absent an emergency, illness or other sudden necessity for
taking leave, an employee shall give reasonable notice to the employee's supervisor of the
employee's intent to use leave under this subchapter. Use of such leave must be scheduled
to prevent undue hardship on the employer as reasonably determined by the employer. If
an employer fails to provide notice as required under section 850‑I, the employee's
obligation to provide notice under this subsection is waived. For purposes of this
subsection, the conditions that constitute undue hardship include, but are not limited to:
A. The employer employs fewer than 15 employees;
B. When, during the period between 3 days before Memorial Day until Labor Day, the
employer is experiencing a labor shortage;
C. The employer generates at least 60% of the employer's annual revenue during a 5-
month period, and it is during that 5-month period; or
D. When more than 25% of the employer's employees are already on leave or have
requested and been approved for leave, including, but not limited to, vacation or
medical or family leave.
An employer may determine additional conditions that constitute undue hardship based on
an individualized assessment of the effect of the leave request on that employer's
operations.
A decision of an employer to deny the use of leave based on undue hardship is not
reviewable by the department or subject to appeal pursuant to section 850-K. This
subsection may not be construed to prevent an employer from granting leave despite a
determination of undue hardship by the employer.
Sec. 2. 26 MRSA §850-B, sub-§10, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA,
§7, is amended to read:
B. In any way curtail the rights, privileges or remedies of any employee under any
collective bargaining agreement or employment contract. This paragraph may not be
construed to prohibit an employer from deducting a portion of the premium as required
pursuant to section 850-F, subsection 5;
Sec. 3. 26 MRSA §850-B, sub-§10, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA,
§7, is amended to read:
D. Require a public an employer, as defined in section 962, subsection 7, or employee
of a public an employer that is a party to a collective bargaining agreement in existence
on the effective date of this subchapter October 25, 2023 to apply any of the rights and
responsibilities under this subchapter until the existing collective bargaining agreement
expires.
Sec. 4. 26 MRSA §850-C, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §7, is
amended to read:
Page 1 - 132LR1651(01)

2. Determination of weekly benefit amount. The weekly benefit amount paid to
employees and an employee or self-employed individuals individual on family leave or
medical leave is calculated as follows: 65% of that employee's or self-employed
individual's average weekly wage.
A. The portion of the covered individual's average weekly wage that is equal to or less
than 50% of the state average weekly wage must be replaced at a rate of 90%; and
B. The portion of the covered individual’s average weekly wage that is more than 50%
of the state average weekly wage must be replaced at a rate of 66% up to the maximum
weekly benefit.
Sec. 5. 26 MRSA §850-D, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §7, is
repealed and the following enacted in its place:
2. Filing of application. The filing of an application for family leave and medical
leave benefits is governed by this subsection.
A. An individual may file an application for family leave benefits or medical leave
benefits no more than 60 days before the anticipated start date of family leave and
medical leave.
B. An individual may file an application for family leave benefits no more than 15
days after the start date of family leave.
C. An individual may file an application for medical leave benefits no more than 30
days after the start date of medical leave. The administrator shall waive the 30-day
filing deadline for good cause.
The administrator shall institute forms and procedures that are not unduly burdensome to
an individual claiming benefits.
Sec. 6. 26 MRSA §850-F, sub-§5, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §7, is
repealed.
Sec. 7. 26 MRSA §850-F, sub-§5-A is enacted to read:
5-A. Payment of share of premium by employees. Payment of an employee's share
of the premium is governed by this subsection.
A. An employer shall deduct 50% of the premium amount required by subsection 3
from an employee's wages and shall remit 100% of the combined premium contribution
required in subsection 3 to the fund.
B. Notwithstanding paragraph A, an employer may pay up to 100% of the employee's
premium amount required by subsection 3 in addition to the amount required to be paid
by the employer, as long as 100% of the amount of the premium required by subsection
3 is remitted.
C. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, an employer subject to
collective bargaining is not required to bargain for the deduction of the premium from
an employee's wages as permitted by this subsection.
Sec. 8. 26 MRSA §850-F, sub-§9, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §7, is
amended to read:
Page 2 - 132LR1651(01)

9. Failure or refusal to make premium contributions. An employer that fails or
refuses to make premium contributions as required in this section must be assessed 1.0%
of its total annual payroll for each year it so failed to comply in addition to any amounts
previously owed, or fraction thereof a fine, in addition to the total amount of family leave
benefits and medical leave benefits paid to covered individuals for whom it failed to make
premium contributions. The rate of assessment imposed by this subsection must be adjusted
annually consistent with subsection 3, paragraph B. The following provisions govern fines
imposed pursuant to this subsection.
A. The maximum amount of the fine is $50 for each employee for whom the employer
failed or refused to make premium contributions.
B. The department shall determine the amount of the fine assessed pursuant to
paragraph A.
C. The department may waive the fine when it determines that equity and good
conscience require the waiver.
D. If the department assesses a fine for underpayment of the premium contributions,
the department shall inform the employer of the amount of the underpayment.
E. An employer notified pursuant to paragraph D may appeal pursuant to section
850-K.
F. An employer found in violation of this subsection that fails to withhold from an
employee the amount allowed pursuant to subsection 5 may deduct the appropriate
amounts from the employee retroactively.
The provisions of this subsection do not apply until January 1, 2026 unless the employer
willfully fails or refuses to make the premium contributions required in this section.
Sec. 9. 26 MRSA §850-M, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. State tax. An individual filing a new claim for family leave benefits or medical
leave benefits under this subchapter may elect to have the administrator deduct and
withhold state income tax from the individual’s payment of benefits at the rate of 5%. The
department shall advise an individual filing a new claim, at the time the individual files the
claim, that:
A. The benefits are subject to state income tax;
B. Requirements exist pertaining to estimated tax payments;
C. The individual may elect to have state income tax deducted and withheld from the
individual's payment of benefits at the rate of 5%; and
D. The individual is permitted to change a previously elected withholding status.
Sec. 10. 36 MRSA §5122, sub-§1, ¶QQ is enacted to read:
QQ. For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2026, an amount equal to
the amount of family leave benefits or medical leave benefits paid pursuant to Title 26,
section 850-C, to the extent those benefits are not included in the taxpayer’s federal
adjusted gross income.
Sec. 11. 36 MRSA §5122, sub-§2, ¶AAA is enacted to read:
Page 3 - 132LR1651(01)

AAA. For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2026, an amount equal
to the amount of any family leave benefits or medical leave benefits that were repaid
by the taxpayer pursuant to Title 26, section 850-L, subsection 2 that have been
previously taxed under this Part.
Sec. 12. 36 MRSA §5255-D is enacted to read:
§5255-D. Withholding on paid family and medical leave benefits
When an individual receiving family leave benefits or medical leave benefits under the
paid family and medical leave benefits program established in Title 26, section 850-B
makes an election pursuant to Title 26, section 850-M, subsection 1-A, the administrator
of the paid family and medical leave benefits program shall deduct and withhold state
income tax at the rate of 5% from the family leave benefits or medical leave benefits paid
to the individual pursuant to Title 26, sections 850-B and 850-C.